New Jersey, session 222, S4262.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1956, c.174 (C.52:18-16.1) or any rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, when the Attorney General, by and through the Office of the Attorney General or other counsel retained by the Attorney General,  represents the State, any political subdivision of the State, or any agency thereof,  in any litigation which results in the receipt of money damages, civil fines, monetary restitution, settlement funds, or other proceeds relating to the litigation, the Attorney General, in consultation with the State Treasurer, shall provide for the deposit of at least 50 percent of such funds in a financial institution that meets the requirements of subsections a. through e. of this section. The financial institution shall: a. Maintain at least 15 percent of its total deposits in the State, as set forth in the most recent Deposit Market Share Report published on the website of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; b. Be licensed or otherwise authorized to do business in this State by the Department of Banking and Insurance (the department) and listed by the department as an approved financial institution; c. Provide escrow, trust, or custody services in the usual course of business and have appropriate expertise, as determined by the department, to open and operate an account holding proceeds of litigation as described in this act; d. Not accept for deposit any proceeds of litigation as described in this act that constitutes more than 10 percent of the financial institutions total deposits; and e. Maintain total deposits of at least $1 billion. 2. In multi-jurisdictional, class action, or mass tort litigation involving the Attorney General, the provisions of this act shall apply only to such proceeds recoverable by the Attorney General, without prejudice to the rights of any other party. 3. The Department of Banking and Insurance shall maintain a directory of New Jersey financial institutions approved by the department for the purposes of this act. Any financial institution approved by the Supreme Court of New Jersey to serve as a repository for an attorney trust account shall be presumptively approved by the department for the purposes of this act. 4. This act shall take effect immediately.